Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.504

Child care facility fund committee—Generally.

The child care facility fund committee is established within the *business assistance center of the department of commerce. The committee shall administer the child care facility fund, with review by the director of commerce.

(1) The committee shall have five members. The director of commerce shall appoint the members, who shall include:

(a) Two persons experienced in investment finance and having skills in providing capital to new businesses, in starting and operating businesses, and providing professional services to small or expanding businesses;

(b) One person representing a philanthropic organization with experience in evaluating funding requests;

(c) One child care services expert; and

(d) One early childhood development expert.

In making these appointments, the director shall give careful consideration to ensure that the various geographic regions of the state are represented and that members will be available for meetings and are committed to working cooperatively to address child care needs in Washington state.

(2) The committee shall elect officers from among its membership and shall adopt policies and procedures specifying the lengths of terms, methods for filling vacancies, and other matters necessary to the ongoing functioning of the committee.

(3) Committee members shall serve without compensation, but may request reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) Committee members shall not be liable to the state, to the child care facility fund, or to any other person as a result of their activities, whether ministerial or discretionary, as members except for willful dishonesty or intentional violation of the law. The department of commerce may purchase liability insurance for members and may indemnify these persons against the claims of others.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2045; 1993 c 280 s 45; 1989 c 430 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The business assistance center and its powers and duties were terminated June 30, 1995. RCW 43.31.083, 43.31.085, 43.31.087, and 43.31.089 were repealed by 1993 c 280 s 81.

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Effective date—1993 c 280: See RCW 43.330.902.

Legislative findings—Severability—1989 c 430: See notes following RCW 43.31.502.